Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 14. Borough Feasibility Studies.

Sec. 44.33.840.
Borough feasibility studies.

The commissioner may contract for studies of the feasibility of establishing boroughs in the unorganized borough. A study may be conducted under this section only if

appropriations are available for that purpose; and

the study is requested by a person residing in the area to be studied or by a city located in the area to be studied.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 44.33.842.
Requests for studies.

A request for a study of the feasibility of establishing a borough in the unorganized borough shall be submitted to the commissioner in writing and must include

a description of the boundaries of the area of the proposed study; and

an indication of local interest in the proposed study consisting of either

a petition requesting the study containing the signatures and addresses of five percent of the voters residing in the area of the proposed study based on the number of voters who voted in the area in the last statewide election; or

resolutions requesting the study adopted by the governing bodies of at least five percent of the cities within the area of the proposed study.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 44.33.844.
Boundaries.

The boundaries of an area studied shall conform to the boundaries indicated in the request for the study under AS

44.33.842

unless the commissioner, after a public hearing held in the area of the proposed study, determines that the boundaries should be altered. In determining the boundaries of an area to be studied, the commissioner shall consider

the standards applicable to the incorporation of boroughs under AS

29.05.031

;

boundaries of regional corporations established under 43 U.S.C. 1606;

census divisions of the state used for the 1980 census; and

boundaries of the regional educational attendance areas established under AS

14.08.031

.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 13 ch 31 SLA 2005)

Sec. 44.33.846.
Contracts.

The commissioner shall contract for a study of the feasibility of establishing a borough in the unorganized borough by following the procedures under AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code). The commissioner shall include terms in the contract that provide for

public participation in the preparation of the study;

completion of the study not later than June 30 of the third year after the year the contract is executed.

A study under this section must include

a recommendation for or against incorporation of a borough containing all or part of the area studied;

an evaluation of the economic development potential of the area studied;

an evaluation of capital facility needs of the area studied;

an evaluation of demographic, social, and environmental factors affecting the area studied;

an evaluation of the relationships among regional educational attendance areas, coastal resource service areas, and other regional entities responsible for providing services in the area studied;

an evaluation of the relationships between the existing cities within the area studied and regional entities responsible for providing services in the area; and

specific recommendations for

organization of a home rule or general law borough government if one is recommended;

changes in organization of cities in the area studied; or

the improvement of the delivery of services to the public by the state in the area studied.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 44.33.849.
Definition.

In AS

44.33.840

—

44.33.849

, “commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.